Hawaii statutes.
§431P-14 Immunity and limitation on
liability. There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of
action of any nature shall arise against, any servicing facility or its
authorized insurance producers; the fund or its agents, employees, or board;
the State; the commissioner; or the commissioner's representatives for any
action taken by them in the performance of their powers and duties under this
chapter; provided that this section shall not be construed to prohibit any
exercise of the commissioner's power pursuant to this chapter or any other law
or rule adopted pursuant to law or chapters 661 and 662, any other law to the
contrary notwithstanding. Nothing in this chapter shall create an obligation,
debt, claim, cause of action, claim for relief, charge, or any other liability
of any kind whatsoever in favor of any person or entity without regard to
whether that person or entity received any benefits under this chapter, against
the State, or its officers and employees. The State and its officers and
employees shall not be liable for the results of any application, denial of
application, claim, loss, or other benefits provided by the fund pursuant to
this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing any
claim against the State whatsoever, nor shall this chapter be construed as
authorizing any claim against the fund in excess of any note, loan, liability,
or other obligation incurred by the fund. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to alter any obligation to pay assessments or charges authorized to
be imposed or levied by the board pursuant to this chapter. The fund shall be
subject to chapter 431 only as provided for in this chapter. [L 1993, c 339, pt
of §2; am L 1998, c 106, §6; am L 2002, c 155, §101]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next